el: Δυνατότητα ρύθμισης αεροτομής: Ρυθμιζόμενη γωνία και ύψος; Ρυθμιζόμενη γωνία; Σταθερό (μη ρυθμιζόμενο); Ρυθμιζόμενο ύψος; Άλλο
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh cánh gió: Điều chỉnh được góc & chiều cao; Điều chỉnh được góc; Cố định (không điều chỉnh được); Điều chỉnh được chiều cao; Khác
ro-RO: Posibilitatea de reglare a spoilerului: Unghi și înălțime ajustabile; Unghi ajustabil; Fix (neajustabil); Înălțime ajustabilă; Altele
fr: Réglage de l’aileron: Angle et hauteur réglables; Angle réglable; Fixe (non réglable); Hauteur réglable; Autre
hu: Légterelő állíthatósága: Állítható dőlésszögű és magasságú; Állítható dőlésszögű; Fix (nem állítható); Állítható magasságú; Egyéb
bg-BG: Регулируемост на спойлера: Регулируеми ъгъл и височина; Регулируем ъгъл; Фиксиран (нерегулируем); Регулируема височина; Друго
ko: 스포일러 조절 기능: 각도 및 높이 조절형; 각도 조절형; 고정형(조절 불가); 높이 조절형; 기타
de: Verstellbarkeit des Spoilers: Winkel & Höhe verstellbar; Winkelverstellbar; Fest (nicht verstellbar); Höhenverstellbar; Sonstige
es: Ajuste del alerón: Ángulo y altura ajustables; Ángulo ajustable; Fijo (no ajustable); Altura ajustable; Otro
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť spojlera: Nastaviteľný uhol a výška; Nastaviteľný uhol; Pevný (nenastaviteľný); Nastaviteľná výška; Iná
fi: Spoilerin säädettävyys: Säädettävä kulma ja korkeus; Säädettävä kulma; Kiinteä (ei säädettävä); Säädettävä korkeus; Muu
lt-LT: Spoilerio reguliuojamumas: Reguliuojamo kampo ir aukščio; Reguliuojamo kampo; Fiksuotas (nereguliuojamas); Reguliuojamo aukščio; Kita
nb: Justerbarhet av spoiler: Justerbar vinkel og høyde; Vinkeljusterbar; Fast (ikke justerbar); Høydejusterbar; Annet
en: Spoiler adjustability: Angle & height adjustable; Angle adjustable; Fixed (non-adjustable); Height adjustable; Other
pt-BR: Spoiler ajustabilidade: Ângulo e altura ajustáveis; Ângulo ajustável; Fixo (não ajustável); Altura ajustável; Outros
it: Regolabilità dello spoiler: Ad angolazione e altezza regolabili; Ad angolazione regolabile; Fisso (non regolabile); Ad altezza regolabile; Altro
sv: Spoilerns justerbarhet: Justerbar vinkel och höjd; Justerbar vinkel; Fast (ej justerbar); Justerbar höjd; Annat
pt-PT: Ajustabilidade do spoiler: Ângulo e altura ajustáveis; Ângulo ajustável; Fixo (não ajustável); Altura ajustável; Outro
ja: スポイラー調整機能: 角度・高さ調整可能; 角度調整可能; 固定 (調整不可); 高さ調整可能; その他
pl: Możliwość regulacji spoilera: Regulacja kąta i wysokości; Regulacja kąta; Stały (bez regulacji); Regulacja wysokości; Inne
ru: Регулируемость спойлера: С регулируемым углом и высотой; С регулируемым углом; Фиксированный (нерегулируемый); С регулируемой высотой; Другое
cs: Nastavitelnost spoileru: Nastavitelný úhel a výška; Nastavitelný úhel; Pevný (nenastavitelný); Nastavitelná výška; Jiné
da: Justerbarhed for spoiler: Vinkel- og højdejusterbar; Vinkeljusterbar; Fast (ikke justerbar); Højdejusterbar; Andet
hr-HR: Podesivost spojlera: Podesivi kut i visina; Podesivi kut; Fiksno (nepodesivo); Podesiva visina; Ostalo
th: ความสามารถในการปรับแต่งสปอยเลอร์: ปรับองศาและความสูงได้; ปรับองศาได้; แบบติดตาย (ปรับไม่ได้); ปรับความสูงได้; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 擾流板可調整性: 角度與高度可調; 角度可調; 固定式 (不可調); 高度可調; 其他
zh-CN: 扰流板可调节性: 角度和高度可调; 角度可调; 固定（不可调）; 高度可调; 其他
nl: Spoiler verstelbaarheid: Hoek en hoogte verstelbaar; Hoek verstelbaar; Vast (niet verstelbaar); Hoogte verstelbaar; Overige
tr: Spoiler ayarlanabilirliği: Açı ve yükseklik ayarlı; Açı ayarlı; Sabit (ayarlanamaz); Yükseklik ayarlı; Diğer
sl-SI: Nastavljivost spojlerja: Nastavljiv kot in višina; Nastavljiv kot; Fiksno (nenastavljivo); Nastavljiva višina; Drugo